Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF12.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1694YH (2) 91 lh/ko H.F. 12 Section 1. MEDICAL RESIDENCY POSITIONS AND AUDITION 1 CLINICALS ââ MEDICAL STUDENTS AND APPLICANTS MEETING CERTAIN 2 CRITERIA ââ ANNUAL REPORT. 3 1. The university of Iowa hospitals and clinics shall offer 4 an interview for an available medical residency position to 5 any applicant who has a residency specialty in obstetrics and 6 gynecology, psychiatry, general surgery, emergency medicine, 7 cardiology, neurology, or primary care and who also is a 8 resident of Iowa, attended and earned an undergraduate degree 9 from an Iowa college or university, or attended and earned a 10 medical degree from a medical school in Iowa. 11 2. The university of Iowa hospitals and clinics shall 12 provide the opportunity to a medical student attending a 13 medical school in Iowa to participate in an audition clinical 14 in the medical residency specialty for which the medical 15 student applies to allow the university to constructively 16 review the student in a clinical setting. 17 3. The university of Iowa hospitals and clinics shall 18 submit a report to the governor and the general assembly by 19 January 15, annually, regarding the audition clinicals and 20 interviews as specified in this section during the prior 21 fiscal year. Specifically, the report shall include for each 22 audition clinical or interview the name of the studentâs or 23 applicantâs medical school, whether the student was offered and 24 participated in an audition clinical, whether an applicant was 25 offered and participated in an interview, whether the applicant 26 was accepted for one of the residency program positions, and 27 the total number of available residency positions filled by an 28 applicant meeting the criteria under this section. 29